Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF693.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; RED RIVER MEDIATION AGREEMENT.new text end new text begin $350,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $350,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources for grants for up to 50 percent of the cost to implement the Red River mediation agreement. new text end